New Jersey, session 222, S4470.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any rule, regulation, order, or provision of law to the contrary, an individual who is 21 years of age or older and eligible to receive private duty nursing services under the Medicaid managed long-term support services program pursuant to N.J.A.C.10:60-5.1 et seq. or its successor regulation shall be eligible to receive up to 24 hours of private duty nursing services in a 24-hour period, if the severity of the individuals illness requires such services, as determined by the Commissioner of Human Services. 2.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall apply for such State plan amendments or waivers as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act and to secure federal financial participation for State Medicaid expenditures under the federal Medicaid program. 3.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to effectuate the purposes of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following the date of enactment, but the Commissioner of Human Services may take such anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.